test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-Clex_kubduv_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - kubduv: # MLO; checked with mum
    kubduv+A+Sg+Nom: kubduv
    kubduv+A+Attr: kubdâ
    kubduv+A+Sg+Gen: kubduu
    kubduv+A+Sg+Acc: kubduu
    kubduv+A+Sg+Ill: kubduvân
    kubduv+A+Sg+Loc: kubduvist
    kubduv+A+Sg+Com: kubduin
    kubduv+A+Sg+Abe: kubduuttáá
    kubduv+A+Ess: kubdâgin
    kubduv+A+Par: kubdâgid
    kubduv+A+Pl+Nom: kubduuh
    kubduv+A+Pl+Gen: kubdui
    kubduv+A+Pl+Acc: kubduid
    kubduv+A+Pl+Ill: kubduid
    kubduv+A+Pl+Loc: kubduin
    kubduv+A+Pl+Com: [kubduiguin, kubduigijn]
    kubduv+A+Pl+Abe: kubduittáá

    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: kobdeeb
    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: kobdeeb
    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: kobdebân
    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: kobdebist
    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Com: kobdebáin
    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: kobdeebttáá
    kubduv+A+Comp+Ess: kobdebin
    kubduv+A+Comp+Par: kobdebid
    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: kobdebeh
    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: kobdebij
    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: kobdebijd
    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: kobdebáid
    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: kobdebijn
    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [kobdebijguin, kobdebijgijn]
    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: kobdebijttáá

    kubduv+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: kobdemus
    kubduv+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: kobdemuu
    kubduv+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: kobdemusân
    kubduv+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: kobdemuust
    kubduv+A+Superl+Sg+Com: kobdemuin
    kubduv+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: kobdemuuttáá
    kubduv+A+Superl+Ess: kobdemussân
    kubduv+A+Superl+Par: kobdemussâd
    kubduv+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: kobdemuuh
    kubduv+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: kobdemui
    kubduv+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: kobdemuid
    kubduv+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: kobdemuid
    kubduv+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: kobdemuin
    kubduv+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [kobdemuiguin, kobdemuigijn]
    kubduv+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: kobdemuittáá
    
    
  Adjective - olluv: # # MLO; checked with mum
    olluv+A+Sg+Nom: olluv
    olluv+A+Attr: ollâ
    olluv+A+Sg+Gen: olluu
    olluv+A+Sg+Acc: olluu
    olluv+A+Sg+Ill: olluvân
    olluv+A+Sg+Loc: olluvist
    olluv+A+Sg+Com: olluin
    olluv+A+Sg+Abe: olluuttáá
    olluv+A+Ess: ollâgin
    olluv+A+Par: ollâgid
    olluv+A+Pl+Nom: olluuh
    olluv+A+Pl+Gen: ollui
    olluv+A+Pl+Acc: olluid
    olluv+A+Pl+Ill: olluid
    olluv+A+Pl+Loc: olluin
    olluv+A+Pl+Com: [olluiguin, olluigijn]
    olluv+A+Pl+Abe: olluittáá

    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aaleeb
    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: aaleeb
    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: alebân
    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: alebist
    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Com: alebáin
    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: aaleebttáá
    olluv+A+Comp+Ess: alebin
    olluv+A+Comp+Par: alebid
    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: alebeh
    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: alebij
    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: alebijd
    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: alebáid
    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: alebijn
    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [alebijguin, alebijgijn]
    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: alebijttáá

    olluv+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: alemus
    olluv+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: alemuu
    olluv+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: alemusân
    olluv+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: alemuust
    olluv+A+Superl+Sg+Com: alemuin
    olluv+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: alemuuttáá
    olluv+A+Superl+Ess: alemussân
    olluv+A+Superl+Par: alemussâd
    olluv+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: alemuuh
    olluv+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: alemui
    olluv+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: alemuid
    olluv+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: alemuid
    olluv+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: alemuin
    olluv+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [alemuiguin, alemuigijn]
    olluv+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: alemuittáá


  Adjective - kossuv: # # MLO; checked with mum
    kossuv+A+Sg+Nom: kossuv
    kossuv+A+Attr: kossâ
    kossuv+A+Sg+Gen: kossuu
    kossuv+A+Sg+Acc: kossuu
    kossuv+A+Sg+Ill: kossuvân
    kossuv+A+Sg+Loc: kossuvist
    kossuv+A+Sg+Com: kossuin
    kossuv+A+Sg+Abe: kossuuttáá
    kossuv+A+Ess: kossâgin
    kossuv+A+Par: kossâgid
    kossuv+A+Pl+Nom: kossuuh
    kossuv+A+Pl+Gen: kossui
    kossuv+A+Pl+Acc: kossuid
    kossuv+A+Pl+Ill: kossuid
    kossuv+A+Pl+Loc: kossuin
    kossuv+A+Pl+Com: [kossuiguin, kossuigijn]
    kossuv+A+Pl+Abe: kossuittáá

    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [kaaseeb, kasseeb]
    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: kaaseeb
    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: kasebân
    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: kasebist
    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Com: kasebáin
    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: kaaseebttáá
    kossuv+A+Comp+Ess: kasebin
    kossuv+A+Comp+Par: kasebid
    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: kasebeh
    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: kasebij
    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: kasebijd
    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: kasebáid
    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: kasebijn
    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [kasebijguin, kasebijgijn]
    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: kasebijttáá

    kossuv+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: kasemus
    kossuv+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: kasemuu
    kossuv+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: kasemusân
    kossuv+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: kasemuust
    kossuv+A+Superl+Sg+Com: kasemuin
    kossuv+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: kasemuuttáá
    kossuv+A+Superl+Ess: kasemussân
    kossuv+A+Superl+Par: kasemussâd
    kossuv+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: kasemuuh
    kossuv+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: kasemui
    kossuv+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: kasemuid
    kossuv+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: kasemuid
    kossuv+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: kasemuin
    kossuv+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [kasemuiguin, kasemuigijn]
    kossuv+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: kasemuittáá



!    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [kubdub, kobdeeb]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: [kubdub, kobdeeb]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: [kubduubân, kobdebân]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: [kubduubist, kobdebist]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [kubduubáin, kobdebáin]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: [kubdubttáá, kobdeebttáá]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Ess: [kubduubin, kobdebin]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Par: [kubduubid, kobdebid]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [kubduubeh, kobdebeh]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [kubduubij, kobdebij]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [kubduubijd, kobdebijd]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: [kubduubáid, kobdebáid]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: [kubduubijn, kobdebijn]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [kubduubijguin, kobdebijguin, kubduubijgijn, kobdebijgijn]
!    kubduv+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: [kubduubijttáá, kobdebijttáá]

!    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ollub, aaleeb]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: [ollub, aaleeb]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: [olluubân, alebân]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: [olluubist, alebist]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [olluubáin, alebáin]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: [ollubttáá, aaleebttáá]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Ess: [olluubin, alebin]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Par: [olluubid, alebid]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [olluubeh, alebeh]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [olluubij, alebij]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [olluubijd, alebijd]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: [olluubáid, alebáid]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: [olluubijn, alebijn]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [olluubijguin, alebijguin, olluubijgijn, alebijgijn]
!    olluv+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: [olluubijttáá, alebijttáá]

!    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [kossub, kaaseeb, kasseeb]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: [kossub, kaaseeb, kasseeb]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: [kossuubân, kasebân]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: [kossuubist, kasebist]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [kossuubáin, kasebáin]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: [kossubttáá, kaaseebttáá]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Ess: [kossuubin, kasebin]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Par: [kossuubid, kasebid]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [kossuubeh, kasebeh]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [kossuubij, kasebij]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [kossuubijd, kasebijd]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: [kossuubáid, kasebáid]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: [kossuubijn, kasebijn]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [kossuubijguin, kasebijguin, kossuubijgijn, kasebijgijn]
!    kossuv+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: [kossuubijttáá, kasebijttáá]
